Hawaii statutes.
[§342L-62] Duties. (a) The advisory
committee shall study issues related to leaks of field-constructed underground fuel
storage tanks at the Red Hill Bulk Fuel Storage Facility, Kuahua Peninsula,
Pacific Missile Range Facility Barking Sands, Hickam Pol Annex, and Schofield
Barracks Military Reservation. The advisory committee shall consider:

(1) The short- and long-term effects of leaks of the
fuel tanks, including effects relating to the health of residents, safe
drinking water, and the environment;

(2) Response strategies to mitigate the effects of leaks
from fuel tanks;

(3) Methods to improve communication between the
United States Navy, Air Force, and Army; the State; any local board of water
supply; and the public in the event of a leak of any fuel tank;

(4) Groundwater test results in relation to the
surrounding areas of fuel tank facilities, with a particular emphasis on the
groundwater near the Red Hill Bulk Fuel Storage Facility;

(5) The implications of shutting down any fuel tank facility;
and

(6) Updates on progress toward meeting goals of
agreement between the State, the affected county, and the federal government.

(b) No later than twenty days before the
convening of each regular session, the advisory committee shall submit a report
of its findings, including groundwater test results, and recommendations,
including any proposed legislation, to the legislature. [L 2016, c 244, pt of
§2]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next